North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 3. Conversion of Domestic Partnership.

§ 59-73.20.
Conversion.

A domestic partnership may convert to a different business entity if:

The conversion is permitted by the laws of the state or country governing the organization and internal affairs of such other business entity; and

The converting domestic partnership complies with the requirements of this Part and, to the extent applicable, the laws referred to in subdivision (1) of this section.

History.

1999-369, s. 4.1; 2001-387, ss. 105(b), 109, 110.

§ 59-73.21.
Plan of conversion.

The converting domestic partnership shall approve a written plan of conversion containing:

The name of the converting domestic partnership;

The name of the resulting business entity into which the domestic partnership shall convert, its type of business entity, and the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs;

The terms and conditions of the conversion; and

The manner and basis for converting the interests in the domestic partnership into interests, obligations, or securities of the resulting business entity or into cash or other property in whole or in part.

(a1)

The plan of conversion may contain other provisions relating to the conversion.

(a2)

The provisions of the plan of conversion, other than the provisions required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this section, may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan of conversion if the plan of conversion sets forth the manner in which the facts will operate upon the affected provisions. The facts may include any of the following:

(1)

Statistical or market indices, market prices of any security or group of securities, interest rates, currency exchange rates, or similar economic or financial data.

(2)

A determination or action by the converting domestic partnership or by any other person, group, or body.

(3)

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the converting domestic partnership is a party, or any other agreement or document.

The plan of conversion shall be approved by the domestic partnership in the manner provided for the approval of the conversion in a written partnership agreement or, if there is no such provision, by the unanimous consent of its partners. If any partner of the converting domestic partnership has or will have personal liability for any existing or future obligation of the resulting business entity solely as a result of holding an interest in the resulting business entity, then in addition to the requirements of the preceding sentence, approval of the plan of conversion by the domestic partnership shall require the consent of that partner. The converting domestic partnership shall provide a copy of the plan of conversion to each partner of the converting domestic partnership at the time provided in a written partnership agreement or, if there is no such provision, prior to its approval of the plan of conversion.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by a domestic partnership but before the articles of conversion become effective, the plan of conversion (i) may be amended as provided in the plan of conversion, or (ii) may be abandoned, subject to any contractual rights, as provided in the plan of conversion or written partnership agreement or, if not so provided, as determined in the manner necessary for approval of the plan of conversion.

History.

2001-387, s. 111; 2001-487, s. 62(t); 2005-268, s. 53.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-268, s. 53, effective October 1, 2005, designated the former last paragraph of subsection (a) as subsection (a1) and added subsection (a2).

§ 59-73.22.
Articles of conversion.

After a plan of conversion has been approved by the converting domestic partnership as provided in

G.S. 59-73.21

, the converting domestic partnership shall deliver articles of conversion to the Secretary of State for filing. The articles of conversion shall state:

The name of the converting domestic partnership;

The name of the resulting business entity, its type of business entity, the state or country whose laws govern its organization and internal affairs, and, if the resulting business entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, a designation of its mailing address and a commitment to file with the Secretary of State a statement of any subsequent change in its mailing address; and

That a plan of conversion has been approved by the domestic partnership as required by law.

If the domestic partnership is converting to a business entity whose formation requires the filing of a document with the Secretary of State, then notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section the articles of conversion shall be included as part of that document and shall contain the information required by the laws governing the organization and internal affairs of the resulting business entity.

If the plan of conversion is abandoned after the articles of conversion have been filed with the Secretary of State but before the articles of conversion become effective, the converting domestic partnership shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing prior to the time the articles of conversion become effective an amendment of the articles of conversion withdrawing the articles of conversion.

The conversion takes effect when the articles of conversion become effective.

Certificates of conversion shall also be registered as provided in

G.S. 47-18.1

.

History.

2001-387, s. 111; 2001-487, s. 62(u).

§ 59-73.23.
Effects of conversion.

When the conversion takes effect:

The converting domestic partnership ceases its prior form of organization and continues in existence as the resulting business entity;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by the converting domestic partnership continues vested in the resulting business entity without reversion or impairment;

All liabilities of the converting domestic partnership continue as liabilities of the resulting business entity;

A proceeding pending by or against the converting domestic partnership may be continued as if the conversion did not occur; and

The interests in the converting domestic partnership that are to be converted into interests, obligations, or securities of the resulting business entity or into the right to receive cash or other property are thereupon so converted, and the former holders of interests in the converting domestic partnership are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of conversion.The conversion shall not affect the liability or absence of liability of any holder of an interest in the converting domestic partnership for any acts, omissions, or obligations of the converting domestic partnership made or incurred prior to the effectiveness of the conversion. The cessation of the existence of the converting domestic partnership in its form of organization as a domestic partnership in the conversion shall not constitute a dissolution or termination of the converting domestic partnership.

If the resulting business entity is not a domestic corporation, a domestic limited partnership, or a domestic limited liability company, when the conversion takes effect the resulting business entity is deemed:

To agree that it may be served with process in this State for enforcement of (i) any obligation of the converting domestic partnership and (ii) any obligation of the resulting business entity arising from the conversion; and

To have appointed the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in any such proceeding. Service on the Secretary of State of any such process shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the Secretary of State, or with any clerk authorized by the Secretary of State to accept service of process, duplicate copies of the process and the fee required by

G.S. 59-35.2

. Upon receipt of service of process on behalf of a resulting business entity in the manner provided for in this section, the Secretary of State shall immediately mail a copy of the process by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the resulting business entity. If the resulting business entity is authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, the address for mailing shall be its principal office designated in the latest document filed with the Secretary of State that is authorized by law to designate the principal office or, if there is no principal office on file, its registered office. If the resulting business entity is not authorized to transact business or conduct affairs in this State, the address for mailing shall be the mailing address designated pursuant to G.S. 59-73.22(a)(2).

History.

2001-387, ss. 111, 170(c); 2001-487, s. 62(v).

§§ 59-73.24 through 59-73.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.